Wisconsin, session 2025, AB966.
do enact as follows:AB966,13Section 1. 165.503 of the statutes is created to read:AB966,2,54165.503 Internet crimes against children public awareness campaign. 5(1) The department of justice shall conduct a children’s online digital safety 1awareness campaign with the goal of raising awareness of the potential dangers of 2Internet use by children and distributing information on steps that may be taken to 3prevent children’s exposure to harmful content on the Internet. The campaign 4shall use a combination of digital platforms, including the department’s website, 5social media platforms, and digital newsletters, and print platforms, if available.AB966,2,86(2) The department of justice shall provide any of the materials developed for 7the digital safety awareness campaign under sub. (1) to a school, as defined in s. 8118.257 (1) (d), free of charge upon request.AB966,2,99